Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.030

Appointments to senate for confirmation—Notice.

For a gubernatorial appointment to be effective, the governor must transmit to the secretary of the senate notice of the appointment, along with pertinent information regarding the appointee, within fourteen days after making any appointment subject to senate confirmation.

[ 1981 c 338 s 12; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.030. Prior: 1890 p 629 s 3; RRS s 10984.]